Maryland, session 2026, HB1028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–3A–02.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1028*

HOUSE BILL 1028
(a) The Caroline County Board of Education consists of:
(1) Three elected members;
(2) Two appointed members; and
(3) Two nonvoting student members.
3–3A–05.
(a) The president of the county board is entitled to receive [$4,000] $6,000
annually as compensation, and the other voting members are entitled to receive [$3,500]
$5,500 each annually as compensation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the president or other voting members of the Caroline County
Board of Education while serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of
this Act, but the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the
president and other voting members of the Caroline County Board of Education shall take
effect at the beginning of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to
an individual appointed or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired
term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.